California, session 20252026, SB1030.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11351.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is repealed.SEC. 2. No appropriation pursuant to under Section 15200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be made for purposes of implementing this act.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS:Heading—Line 3.___________________